Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB583.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 443.6(g) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection SUBSECTIONS to read:Section 443.6. Reimbursement for Certain Medical Assistance Items and Services.--* * *(g) The department shall establish [benefit packages for dental and] a benefit package for pharmacy services for medical assistance recipients twenty-one years of age or older, and any exceptions to [such] the benefit [packages] package as the department determines are appropriate. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including this section, during State fiscal <--12345678910111213141516171819 year 2011-2012, the department shall establish such benefit [packages] package, limits and exceptions thereto by publication of one or more notices in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. A notice shall describe the available benefit [packages] package or limits and any exceptions thereto. The benefit [packages] package, limits and exceptions thereto shall take effect as specified in the notice and remain in effect until changed by a subsequent notice issued on or before June 30, 2012, or thereafter by department regulation.(h) The department shall establish a benefit package for dental services for medical assistance recipients twenty-one years of age or older. T he department shall revise the benefit package for dental services by publication of a notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The benefit package shall take effect as specified in the notice. The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, if needed, to allow the medical assistance program to provide coverage for dental services in accordance with this section. Subject to available funding, the benefit package under this subsection:(1) shall include all dental services provided prior to the dental benefit package changes announced under 41 Pa.B. 5133 (September 24, 2011); and (2) may include additional dental services beyond those currently provided and those provided prior to the dental benefit package changes announced under 41 Pa.B. 5133 (September 24, 2011).(I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (H), IF ADEQUATE FUNDING IS NOT AVAILABLE TO INCLUDE ALL DENTAL SERVICES PROVIDED PRIOR TO THE DENTAL BENEFIT PACKAGE ANNOUNCED UNDER 41 PA.B. 5133 20250HB0583PN1978 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (SEPTEMBER 24, 2011), THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER FEWER DENTAL BENEFIT SERVICES THAN WHAT WAS PROVIDED PRIOR TO THE DENTAL BENEFIT PACKAGE CHANGES UNTIL AVAILABLE FUNDING IS PROVIDED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (H). THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ALLOW FOR THE LIMITATION OR ELIMINATION OF ANY DENTAL BENEFIT SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER 41 PA.B. 5133 (SEPTEMBER 24, 2011).Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. If a Federal waiver under section 443.6(h) of the act or a State plan amendment is approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 2 of this act shall take effect immediately following publication of the notice under section 3 of this act.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0583PN1978 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021